Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB726.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.17A-138 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Equivalent" means reimbursement in an amount equal to what
reimbursement would have been had the service been furnished in person by
that provider at the provider's place of service;
(b) "Federally-qualified[Federally qualified] health center" has the same
meaning[means the same] as in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396d;
(c) "Federally qualified health center look-alike" means an organization that
meets all of the eligibility requirements of a federally-qualified[federally
qualified] health center but does not receive federal grants issued pursuant to
42 U.S.C. sec. 254b;
(d) "Originating site" means the site at which a Medicaid beneficiary is physically
located at the time a telehealth service or telehealth consultation is provided;
(e) "Provider" has the same meaning[means the same] as in KRS 304.17A-005
and also includes behavioral health professionals licensed under KRS
Chapters 309, 319, and 335;
(f) ["Telehealth" has the same meaning as in KRS 211.332; and
(g) ]"Rural health clinic" has the same meaning[means the same] as in 42 U.S.C.
sec. 1395x; and
(g) "Telehealth" has the same meaning as in KRS 211.332.
(2) (a) A health benefit plan[, issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2022,] shall
reimburse for covered services provided to an insured person through
telehealth, including telehealth services provided by a home health agency
licensed under KRS Chapter 216.
(b) Telehealth coverage and reimbursement shall, except as provided in paragraph
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/24/2026 8:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1859
(c)[(b)] of this subsection, be equivalent to the coverage for the same service
provided in person unless the telehealth provider and the health benefit plan
contractually agree to a lower reimbursement rate for telehealth services.
(c)[(b)] Rural health clinics, federally-qualified[federally qualified] health
centers, and federally qualified health center look-alikes shall be reimbursed
as an originating site in an amount equal to that which is permitted under 42
U.S.C. sec. 1395m for Medicare-participating providers, if:
1. The insured was physically located at the rural health clinic, federally-
qualified[federally qualified] health center, or federally qualified health
center look-alike at the time of service or consultation delivery; and
2. The provider of the telehealth service or telehealth consultation is not
employed by the rural health clinic, federally-qualified[federally
qualified] health center, or federally qualified health center look-alike.
(3) In accordance with KRS 211.336, a health benefit plan[, issued or renewed on or
after January 1, 2022]:
(a) Shall not:
1. Require a provider to be physically present with a patient or client,
unless the provider determines that it is necessary to perform those
services in person;
2. Require prior authorization, medical review, or administrative clearance
for telehealth that would not be required if a service were provided in
person;
3. Require demonstration that it is necessary to provide services to a
patient or client through telehealth;
4. Require a provider to be employed by another provider or agency in
order to provide telehealth services that would not be required if that
service were provided in person;
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/24/2026 8:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1859
5. Restrict or deny coverage of telehealth based solely on the
communication technology or application used to deliver the telehealth
services; or
6. Require a provider to be part of a telehealth network;
(b) Shall:
1. Require that telehealth services reimbursed under this section meet all
clinical, technology, and medical coding guidelines for recipient safety
and appropriate delivery of services established by the department[ of
Insurance] or the provider's professional licensure board; and
2. [Require a telehealth provider to be licensed in Kentucky, or as allowed
under the standards and provisions of a recognized interstate compact, in
order to receive reimbursement for telehealth services; and
3. ]Reimburse a rural health clinic, federally qualified health clinic, or
federally qualified health center look-alike for covered telehealth
services provided by a provider employed by the rural health clinic,
federally qualified health clinic, or federally qualified health center
look-alike, regardless of whether the provider was physically located on
the premises of the rural health clinic, federally qualified health clinic,
or federally qualified health clinic look-alike when the telehealth service
was provided; and
(c) May:
1. Utilize audits for medical coding accuracy in the review of telehealth
services specific to audio-only encounters; and
2. Require a telehealth provider to be licensed in Kentucky, or as allowed
under the standards and provisions of a recognized interstate compact,
in order to receive reimbursement for telehealth services.
(4) (a) Benefits for a service provided through telehealth required by this section may
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/24/2026 8:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1859
be made subject to a deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirement.
(b) A deductible, copayment, or coinsurance applicable to a particular service
provided through telehealth shall not exceed the deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance required by the health benefit plan for the same service provided
in person.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a health benefit plan to:
(a) Provide coverage for telehealth services that are not medically necessary;[ or]
(b) Reimburse any fees charged by a telehealth facility for transmission of a
telehealth encounter; or
(c) Provide in-network coverage or reimbursement to out-of-network providers
unless the coverage or reimbursement is provided under the health benefit
plan for the same service provided in person.
(6) Providers and home health agencies are strongly encouraged to use audio-only
encounters as a mode of delivering telehealth services when no other approved
mode of delivering telehealth services is available.
(7) The commissioner[department] shall promulgate an administrative regulation in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to designate the claim forms and records
required to be maintained in conjunction with this section.
Section 2. KRS 164.2871 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of each state postsecondary educational institution is
authorized to purchase liability insurance for the protection of the individual
members of the governing board, faculty, and staff of such institutions from liability
for acts and omissions committed in the course and scope of the individual's
employment or service. Each institution may purchase the type and amount of
liability coverage deemed to best serve the interest of such institution.
(2) All retirement annuity allowances accrued or accruing to any employee of a state
postsecondary educational institution through a retirement program sponsored by
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/24/2026 8:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1859
the state postsecondary educational institution are hereby exempt from any state,
county, or municipal tax, and shall not be subject to execution, attachment,
garnishment, or any other process whatsoever, nor shall any assignment thereof be
enforceable in any court. Except retirement benefits accrued or accruing to any
employee of a state postsecondary educational institution through a retirement
program sponsored by the state postsecondary educational institution on or after
January 1, 1998, shall be subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020, to the extent
provided in KRS 141.010 and 141.0215.
(3) Except as provided in KRS Chapter 44, the purchase of liability insurance for
members of governing boards, faculty and staff of institutions of higher education
in this state shall not be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity or any
other immunity or privilege.
(4) The governing board of each state postsecondary education institution is authorized
to provide a self-insured employer group health plan to its employees, which plan
shall:
(a) Conform to the requirements of Subtitle 32 of KRS Chapter 304; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, be exempt from
conformity with Subtitle 17A of KRS Chapter 304.
(5) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of a
state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.17A-129;
(b) KRS 304.17A-133;
(c) Section 1 of this Act;
(d) KRS 304.17A-145;
(e)[(d)] KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(f)[(e)] KRS 304.17A-261;
(g)[(f)] KRS 304.17A-262;
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/24/2026 8:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1859
(h)[(g)] KRS 304.17A-264; and
(i)[(h)] KRS 304.17A-265.
(6) (a) A self-insured employer group health plan provided by the governing board of
a state postsecondary education institution to its employees shall provide a
special enrollment period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in
accordance with the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The governing board of a state postsecondary education institution shall, at or
before the time an employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the
plan or coverage, provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment
rights under this subsection.
Section 3. Section 2 of this Act applies to health benefit plans issued or
renewed on or after the effective date of this Act.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/24/2026 8:44 AM Jacketed